sl-SI: Kakovostni razred žogice za badminton: Klubski; Tekmovalni; Srednji; Za vajo; Profesionalni; Turnirski; Za trening; Drugo
es: Grado del volante de bádminton: Club; Competición; Intermedio; Práctica; Profesional; Torneo; Entrenamiento; Otro
el: Κατηγορία φτερού μπάντμιντον: Ομίλου; Αγώνων; Μεσαίου επιπέδου; Πρακτικής; Επαγγελματικό; Τουρνουά; Προπόνησης; Άλλο
vi: Cầu lông loại: Câu lạc bộ; Thi đấu; Trung cấp; Luyện tập; Chuyên nghiệp; Giải đấu; Huấn luyện; Khác
th: ลูกแบดมินตันเกรด: สโมสร; แข่งขัน; ระดับกลาง; ซ้อม; มืออาชีพ; ทัวร์นาเมนต์; ฝึกซ้อม; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Plunksninuko klasė: Klubinis; Varžybinis; Vidutinio lygio; Praktikos; Profesionalus; Turnyrinis; Treniruočių; Kita
nb: Fjærballkvalitet: Klubb; Konkurranse; Mellomnivå; Øvelse; Profesjonell; Turnering; Trening; Annet
pt-BR: Peteca grau: Clube; Competição; Intermediário; Prática; Profissional; Torneio; Treinamento; Outro
cs: Kuželka třídy: Klubové; Soutěžní; Pro mírně pokročilé; Cvičné; Profesionální; Turnajové; Tréninkové; Jiné
nl: Shuttle klasse: Club; Competitie; Gemiddeld; Oefening; Professioneel; Toernooi; Training; Overig
ru: Класс волана: Клубный; Соревновательный; Средний уровень; Для практики; Профессиональный; Турнирный; Тренировочный; Другое
it: Grado del volano: Club; Competizione; Intermedio; Pratica; Professionale; Torneo; Allenamento; Altro
hu: Tollaslabda besorolása: Klub; Versenyszintű; Középhaladó; Gyakorló; Professzionális; Bajnokság; Edző; Egyéb
hr-HR: Razred loptice: Klupska; Natjecateljska; Srednja razina; Za vježbu; Profesionalna; Turnirska; Za trening; Ostalo
zh-CN: 羽毛球等级: 俱乐部级; 竞技级; 中级; 练习级; 专业级; 锦标赛级; 训练级; 其他
pl: Klasa lotki: Klubowy; Zawodniczy; Średnio zaawansowany; Do ćwiczeń; Profesjonalny; Turniejowy; Treningowy; Inne
pt-PT: Classificação do shuttlecock: Clube; Competição; Intermédio; Prática; Profissional; Torneio; Treino; Outro
fi: Sulkapallon luokka: Kerho; Kilpailu; Keskitaso; Harjoitus; Ammattilainen; Turnaus; Treeni; Muu
sv: Badmintonbollskvalitet: Klubb; Tävling; Medelnivå; Övning; Professionell; Turnering; Träning; Övrigt
de: Qualitätsstufe des Federballs: Verein; Wettkampf; Fortgeschrittene; Übung; Professionell; Turnier; Training; Andere
da: Fjerboldkvalitet: Klub; Konkurrence; Let øvet; Øvelse; Professionel; Turnering; Træning; Andet
bg-BG: Клас на перцето за бадминтон: Клубен; Състезателен; Средно ниво; За упражнения; Професионален; Турнирен; Тренировъчен; Друг
zh-TW: 羽毛球等級: 俱樂部級; 競賽級; 中級; 練習級; 專業級; 錦標賽級; 訓練級; 其他
tr: Badminton topu sınıfı: Kulüp; Müsabaka; Orta seviye; Pratik; Profesyonel; Turnuva; Antrenman; Diğer
fr: Catégorie du volant: Club; Compétition; Intermédiaire; Pratique; Professionnel; Tournoi; Entraînement; Autre
ko: 셔틀콕 등급: 클럽용; 대회용; 중급자용; 연습용; 전문가용; 토너먼트용; 훈련용; 기타
ja: シャトルコックグレード: クラブ; コンペティション; 中級; 練習用; プロ用; トーナメント; トレーニング; その他
sk-SK: Trieda bedmintonového košíka: Klubové; Súťažné; Stredne pokročilí; Cvičné; Profesionálne; Turnajové; Tréningové; Iné
ro-RO: Grad de calitate al fluturașului de badminton: Club; Competiție; Intermediar; Practică; Profesional; Turneu; Antrenament; Altul
en: Shuttlecock grade: Club; Competition; Intermediate; Practice; Professional; Tournament; Training; Other